Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1707
Policy or certificate of insurance; type issued; when delivered; application; acceptance.

(1) All credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance sold shall be evidenced by an individual policy, or in case of group insurance, by a certificate of insurance, which individual policy or group certificate of insurance shall be delivered to the debtor.

(2) Each individual policy or group certificate of credit life insurance, credit accident and health insurance, or combination thereof, shall, in addition to other requirements of law, set forth the name and home office address of the insurer, the name of the debtor, the premium or amount of payment, if any, by the debtor separately for credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance, a description of the amount, term and coverage including any exceptions, limitations, or restrictions, and shall state that the benefits shall be paid to the creditor to reduce or extinguish the unpaid indebtedness and, wherever the amount of insurance may exceed the unpaid indebtedness, that any such excess shall be payable to the beneficiary, other than the creditor, named by the debtor or to his estate.

(3) Said individual policy or group certificate of insurance shall be delivered to the insured debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred except as hereinafter provided.

(4) If said individual policy or group certificate of insurance is not delivered to the debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred, a copy of the application for such policy or a notice of proposed insurance, signed by the debtor and setting forth the name and home office address of the insurer, the name of the debtor, the premium or amount of payment by the debtor, if any, separately for credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance, a description of the amount, term and coverage provided, shall be delivered to the debtor at the time such indebtedness is incurred. The copy of the application for, or notice of proposed insurance, shall refer exclusively to insurance coverage, and shall be separate and apart from the loan, sale or other credit statement of account, instrument or agreement, unless the information required by this subsection is prominently set forth therein. Upon acceptance of the insurance by the insurer and within thirty days of the date upon which the indebtedness is incurred, the insurer shall cause the individual policy or group certificate of insurance to be delivered to the debtor. The application or notice of proposed insurance shall state that upon acceptance by the insurer, the insurance shall become effective as of the date the indebtedness is incurred.

Laws 1959, c. 214, § 7, p. 739.

Debtor was aware that total credit insurance was fifteen thousand dollars and failure to deliver policy or certificate to debtor did not preclude recovery on note for larger amount. Elm Creek State Bank v. Johnson, 195 Neb. 131, 236 N.W.2d 838 (1975).